District of Columbia statutes.
28:2A-521

Lessee’s right to specific performance or replevin.

(a)

Specific performance may be decreed if the goods are unique or in other proper circumstances.

(b)

A decree for specific performance may include any terms and conditions as to payment of the rent, damages, or other relief that the court deems just.

(c)

A lessee has a right of replevin, detinue, sequestration, claim and delivery, or the like for goods identified to the lease contract if after reasonable effort the lessee is unable to effect cover for those goods or the circumstances reasonably indicate that the effort will be unavailing.

History

July 22, 1992, D.C. Law 9-128, § 2(b), 39 DCR 3830

Section References

This section is referenced in § 28:2A-508.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 28:2A-521.

Uniform Commercial Code Comment

Uniform Statutory Source:Section 2-716.

Changes: Revised to reflect leasing practices and terminology, and to expand the reference to the right of replevin in subsection (3) to include other similar rights of the lessee.

Definitional Cross References: “Delivery”. Section 1-201(14).

“Goods”. Section 2A-103(1)(h).

“Lease contract”. Section 2A-103(1)(l).

“Lessee”. Section 2A-103(1)(n).

“Rights”. Section 1-201(36).

“Term”. Section 1-201(42).